Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-202
Purchaser, defined.

The term purchaser, as used in sections 76-201 to 76-281 and 76-2,126, shall be construed
to embrace every person to whom any real estate or interest therein shall
be conveyed for valuable consideration and
also any assignee of mortgage or lease or
other conditional estate.

R.S.1866, c. 43, § 50, p. 291;

R.S.1913, § 6188;

C.S.1922, § 5587;

C.S.1929, § 76-102;

R.S.1943, § 76-202;

Laws 2012, LB536, § 27.

Holder of ninety-nine year lease was not purchaser of real estate from county, and lease by county board was valid. Lindburg v. Bennett, 117 Neb. 66, 219 N.W. 851 (1928).

Lease of school lands for purpose of removing minerals therefrom is void. Fawn Lake Ranch Co. v. Cumbow, 102 Neb. 288, 167 N.W. 75 (1918).

Second mortgagee is a purchaser. Dorr v. Meyer, 51 Neb. 94, 70 N.W. 543 (1897).